Utah statutes.
35A-3-313.   Performance goals.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Performance goals" means a target level of performance or an expected level of performance against which actual performance is compared.

(b)  "Performance indicators" means actual performance information regarding a program or activity.

(c)  "Performance monitoring system" means a process to regularly collect and analyze performance information including performance indicators and performance goals.

(2) (a)  The department shall establish a performance monitoring system for cash assistance provided under this part.

(b)  The department shall establish the performance indicators and performance goals that will be used in the performance monitoring system for cash assistance under this part.

(c) (i) The department shall submit an annual written report to the legislative fiscal analyst and the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee before November 1 describing the difference between actual performance and performance goals for the second, third, and fourth quarters of the prior fiscal year and the first quarter of the current fiscal year.

(ii) (A)  The legislative fiscal analyst or the analyst's designee shall convey the information contained in the report to the appropriation subcommittee that has oversight responsibilities for the Department of Workforce Services during the General Session that follows the submission of the report.

(B)  The subcommittee may consider the information in its deliberations regarding the budget for services and supports under this chapter.

